North Carolina, session 2025, SB570.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PROHIBIT A COMMON STAKEHOLDER BETWEEN MEDICAL
PRACTICES AND MANAGEMENT SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 55B-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 55B-2. Definitions.
As used in this Chapter, the following words shall, unless the context requires otherwise,
have the following meanings:
(1) "Disqualified person" means a Disqualified person. – A licensed person who
for any reason becomes legally disqualified to render the same professional
services which that are or were being rendered by the professional corporation
of which such the person is an officer, director, shareholder or employee.
(2) "Licensee" means any Licensee. – Any natural person who is duly licensed by
the appropriate licensing board to render the same professional services which
that will be rendered by the professional corporation of which he the licensee
is, or intends to become, an officer, director, shareholder shareholder, or
employee.
(3) "Licensing board" means a Licensing board. – A board which is charged with
the licensing and regulating of the profession or practice in this State in which
the professional corporation is organized to engage.
(4) The term "licensing board," Licensing board, as the same it applies to
attorneys at law, shall mean the law. – The Council of the North Carolina State
Bar, and it shall include including the North Carolina State Board of Law
Examiners only to the extent that the North Carolina Board of Law Examiners
is authorized to issue licenses for the practice of law under the supervision of
the Council of the North Carolina State Bar.
(4a) Management services organization. – A domestic or foreign entity that
provides non-clinical services to a professional corporation rendering
professional service under Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(5) "Professional corporation" means a Professional corporation. – A corporation
which is engaged in rendering the professional services as herein specified
and defined, service pursuant to a certificate of registration issued by the
Licensing Board regulating the profession or practice, and which that (i) has
*S570-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
as its shareholders only those individuals permitted by G.S. 55B-6 of this
Chapter to be shareholders and which Chapter, (ii) designates itself as may be
required by this statute, Chapter, and which (ii) is organized under the
provisions of this Chapter and of Chapter 55, the North 55 of the General
Statutes, "North Carolina Business Corporation Act. Act."
(6) The term "professional service" means any Professional service. – Any type
of personal or professional service of the public which that requires as a
condition precedent to the rendering of such the service the obtaining of a
license from a licensing board as herein defined, and pursuant to the following
provisions of the General Statutes: Chapter 83A, "Architects"; Chapter 84,
"Attorneys-at-Law"; Chapter 93, "Public Accountants"; and the following
Articles in Chapter 90: Article 1, "Practice of Medicine," Article 2,
"Dentistry," Article 6, "Optometry," Article 7, "Osteopathy," Article 8,
"Chiropractic," Article 9A, "Nursing Practice Act," with regard to registered
nurses, Article 11, "Veterinarians," Article 12A, "Podiatrists," Article 18A,
"Practicing Psychologists," Article 18C, "Marriage and Family Therapy
Licensure," Article 18D, "Occupational Therapy," Article 22, "Licensure Act
for Speech and Language Pathologists and Audiologists," and Article 24,
"Licensed Clinical Mental Health Counselors"; Chapter 89C, "Engineering
and Land Surveying"; Chapter 89A, "Landscape Architects"; Chapter 90B,
"Social Worker Certification and Licensure Act" with regard to Licensed
Clinical Social Workers as defined by G.S. 90B-3; Chapter 89E, "Geologists";
Chapter 89B, "Foresters"; and Chapter 89F, "North Carolina Soil Scientist
Licensing Act."
(9) Stakeholder. – An incorporator, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of
a professional corporation or management services organization."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 55B-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 55B-4. Formation of corporation.
A professional corporation under this Chapter may be formed pursuant to the provisions of
Chapter 55, the North Carolina Business Corporation Act, with the following limitations:
(1) At least one incorporator shall be a "licensee" as hereinabove defined in
G.S. 55B-2(2).
(2) All of the shares of stock of the corporation shall be owned and held by a
licensee, or licensees, as hereinabove defined in G.S. 55B-2(2), except as
otherwise permitted in G.S. 55B-6.
(3) At least one director and one officer shall be a "licensee" as hereinabove
defined in G.S. 55B-2(2).
(4) The articles of incorporation, in addition to the requirements of Chapter 55,
shall designate the personal services to be rendered by the professional
corporation and shall be accompanied by a certification by the appropriate
licensing board that the ownership of the shares of stock is in compliance with
the requirements of G.S. 55B-4(2) subdivision (2) of this section and
G.S. 55B-6. If applicable, it shall also certify that stakeholders are in
compliance with subdivision (5) of this section.
(5) For a professional corporation rendering professional service pursuant to
Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, no stakeholder of the
professional corporation shall be a stakeholder of a management services
organization with which the professional corporation shall at any time contract
for services unless the management services organization is owned and held
entirely by licensees of this State."
Page 2 Senate Bill 570-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) For purposes of this subsection, "stakeholder" is defined as in
G.S. 55B-2. Pursuant to its authority under G.S. 55B-10, the North Carolina Medical Board shall
adopt rules to require that an application for certificate of registration for a professional
corporation or professional limited liability company and each annual renewal include a
statement certifying that no stakeholder is also a stakeholder of a management services
organization with which the professional corporation or limited liability company contracts for
services, unless the management services organization is owned and held entirely by licensees of
this State.
SECTION 1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
contracts entered into, modified, or renewed on or after that date. Rules adopted pursuant to this
section shall be adopted to take effect as soon as practicable but no later than October 1, 2026.

PART II. REQUIRE THAT PHYSICIANS HAVE CONTROL OF PATIENT CARE
WITHOUT INTERFERENCE FROM NON-PHYSICIANS
SECTION 2.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-8.3. Control over medical decisions of patient care.
If a licensee is employed by or is an independent contractor in a contractual agreement with
an employer under G.S. 90-8.4(a) to practice medicine or surgery, then the employment
agreement or contract shall ensure and require that the licensee has control over all medical
decisions of patient care without clinical interference from (i) an individual not licensed to
practice medicine or surgery, (ii) a stakeholder of a management services organization, or (iii) an
out-of-state physician or medical professional who may be employed by or affiliated with the
professional corporation. For purposes of this section, the term "stakeholder" and "management
services organization" are defined as in Chapter 55B of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2.(b) Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-8.4. Practice of medicine permitted entities; enforcement.
(a) Other than sole proprietors and partnerships with other licensees of this Article,
licensees shall only practice on behalf of the following entities, as an employee or an independent
contractor:
(1) Professional corporations, including foreign professional corporations as
defined by G.S. 55B-16(b), registered with the Board pursuant to Chapter 55B
of the General Statutes or professional limited liability companies registered
with the Board pursuant to G.S. 57D-2-02. The ownership requirements shall
comply with Chapter 55B of the General Statutes.
(2) Entities licensed, certified, or registered with the North Carolina Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation,
including hospitals and mental health facilities.
(3) Non-profits or free clinics providing medical services to indigent populations
that are not required to be licensed, certified, or registered with the North
Carolina Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Service Regulation.
(4) Health maintenance organizations established under Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
(5) Federal or State agencies providing health care services, including the North
Carolina Department of Public Safety, Division of Adult Correction and
Juvenile Justice; United Stated Veterans Health Administration; United States
Armed Forces or Public Health Service; or any federally recognized tribe
subject to tribal law.
Senate Bill 570-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Any other employer recognized by the Board pursuant to a rule adopted by
the Board.
Licensees who are hired as independent contractors through staffing companies to practice
medicine shall contract only with one of the entities in this subsection.
(b) If the Board receives a complaint or report alleging violation of this section, upon the
Board's request, an employer under subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section shall provide a
response to the Board signed by a majority of shareholders, a majority of the board of directors,
or the Chief Medical Officer or Chief Executive Officer, as applicable, that includes all of the
following:
(1) Explanation of the structure and ownership interests of the entity, including
the roles, responsibilities, and relationships between the medical staff,
stakeholders as defined by G.S. 55B-2, hospital administration, and hospital
governing board.
(2) Affirmation that the employer shall not (i) prevent the licensee from meeting
the standards of acceptable and prevailing medical practice in this State, (ii)
require the licensee to practice beyond his or her area of competence, or (iii)
prevent the licensee from complying with any requirement under Article 1 of
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, any rule adopted by the Board, or any
other law pertaining to the practice of medicine.
(3) Affirmation that the licensee's professional medical judgment takes priority
when the interests of the employer and licensee conflict.
(4) Affirmation that the employment agreement will not impact the patient's right
to choose the patient's health care provider or continuity of care if the
employment relationship is terminated.
(5) Affirmation that the employer shall not interfere with the patient's right to
access the patient's medical records or the right to be notified of the licensee's
departure or new practice information.
(c) All bylaws requested by the Board are public record under Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes.
(d) An employer who fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section and, if applicable,
with Chapter 55B of the General Statutes, is an unapproved employer and shall not hire licensees
of the Board. An employer required to comply with Chapter 55B of the General Statutes that fails
to do so may be subject to suspension or revocation of its certificate of registration by the Board.
(e) Working as an employee or independent contractor for an unapproved employer is
grounds for discipline under G.S. 90-14(a).
(f) The Board may consult with the Attorney General's Office to investigate alleged
violations of this section or Chapter 55B of the General Statutes and may refer the matter for
prosecution.
(g) If the Board investigates alleged violations of this section or Chapter 55B of the
General Statutes, the Board may inform the Attorney General's Office of its findings. The
Attorney General shall review any findings provided by the Board under this section and shall
take appropriate action or seek appropriate relief or legal remedies if the Board is consulted and
agrees with the Attorney General to pursue alleged violations.
(h) The Board shall only reinstate approval of employers upon recommendation of the
North Carolina Medical Care Commission, the Attorney General, or pursuant to a court finding
that the violations of this section have been rectified."
SECTION 2.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
contracts entered into, modified, or renewed on or after that date.

PART III. RULEMAKING AND EFFECTIVE DATE
Page 4 Senate Bill 570-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(a) The North Carolina Board of Medicine may adopt rules to
implement Part II of this act.
SECTION 3.(b) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 570-First Edition Page 5